District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-304

Malicious burning of fences, woods, crops.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1323, ch. 854, § 822
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(c), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-404.
1973 Ed., § 22-404.